Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-10,107
Order for delivery of property; directed to other counties; successive orders; taxation of costs.

An order may be directed to any other county than the one in which the action is brought, for the delivery of the property claimed. Several orders may issue at the same time, or successively, at the option of the plaintiff; but only one of them shall be taxed in the costs, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

R.S.1867, Code § 194, p. 424;

R.S.1913, § 7836;

C.S.1922, § 8780;

C.S.1929, § 20-10,107;

R.S.1943, § 25-10,107.

Order may be enforced by mandamus against warden of penitentiary. Hopkins v. State ex rel. Omaha Cooperage Co., 64 Neb. 10, 89 N.W. 401 (1902).